Illinois, session 104th, HB3577.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title.This Act may be referred to as the 5Rafael Wordlaw Act. 6    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 7changing Sections 24-1, 24-1.6, 24-2, and 24-5.1 as follows: 8    (720 ILCS 5/24-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-1)9    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful possession of weapons. 10    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of 11weapons when he knowingly:12        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 13    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 14    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon 15    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 16    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 17    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure 18    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 19    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 20    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 21    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or22        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same   HB3577- 2 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 2    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 3    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or 4    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or5        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 6    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church, 7    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 8    used for religious worship; or 9        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 10    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 11    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 12    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 13    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 14    18 years of age or older; or15        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed 16    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 17    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 18    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as 19    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 20    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 21    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect 22    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 23    conditions:24            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or25            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or26            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm   HB3577- 3 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 2        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 3        Owner's Identification Card; or4            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 5        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 6        been issued a currently valid license under the 7        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 8        (5) Sets a spring gun; or9        (6) Possesses any device or attachment of any kind 10    designed, used or intended for use in silencing the report 11    of any firearm; or12        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 13    carries:14            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 15        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which 16        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 17        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 18        without manually reloading by a single function of the 19        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 20        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 21        or carries any combination of parts designed or 22        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 23        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 24        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 25        possession or under the control of a person. "Machine 26        gun" also includes any firearm that is modified or   HB3577- 4 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        equipped with a forced reset trigger, including an 2        auto-switch or binary switch. In this subparagraph 3        (i), "forced reset trigger" means a combination of 4        parts designed and intended for use in converting a 5        weapon to shoot automatically more than one shot, 6        without manual reloading, by a single function of the 7        trigger;8            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 9        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 10        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 11        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by 12        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 13        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 14        26 inches; or15            (ii-5) any firearm that is modified or equipped 16        with a high-capacity magazine. In this subparagraph 17        (ii-5), "high-capacity magazine" means a magazine, 18        belt, drum, feed strip, or similar device, including 19        any such device joined or coupled with another in any 20        manner, that has an overall capacity of more than 15 21        rounds of ammunition. "High-capacity magazine" does 22        not include an attached tubular device to accept, and 23        capable of operating only with, .22 caliber rimfire 24        ammunition; or 25            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 26        other container containing an explosive substance of   HB3577- 5 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 2        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 3        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or4        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 5    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 6    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 7    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any 8    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 9    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 10    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of 11    unloaded firearms is conducted.12        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 13    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit 14    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 15    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or16        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 17    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 18    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 19    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 20    identity; or21        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 22    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 23    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 24    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 25    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 26    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land   HB3577- 6 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 2    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 3    another person as an invitee with that person's 4    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 5    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 6    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 7    one of the following conditions:8            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or9            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or10            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 11        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 12        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 13        Owner's Identification Card; or14            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 15        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 16        been issued a currently valid license under the 17        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 18        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 19    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 20    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 21    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon 22    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 23    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 24    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any 25    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 26    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or   HB3577- 7 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 2    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 3    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or4        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 5    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 6    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 7    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a) 8    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 9    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 10    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the 11    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 12    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 13    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with 14    the propellant contained in such tube between the 15    projectile and the cap; or16        (12) (Blank); or17        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 18    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 19    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 20    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 21    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club" 22    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 23    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 24    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or25        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 26    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any   HB3577- 8 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 2    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 3    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 4    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 5    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 6    or7        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50 8    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or9        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 10    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in 11    violation of Section 24-1.9. 12    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 13subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10), 14subsection 24-1(a)(11), subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 24-1(a)(15) 15commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted of a 16violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits a 17Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 18subsection 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7)(ii), 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 1924-1(a)(16) commits a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a 20violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) or 24-1(a)(7)(ii-5) 21commits a Class 2 felony and shall be sentenced to a term of 22imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 23years, unless the weapon is possessed in the passenger 24compartment of a motor vehicle as defined in Section 1-146 of 25the Illinois Vehicle Code, or on the person, while the weapon 26is loaded, in which case it shall be a Class X felony. A person   HB3577- 9 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection 224-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(8), 24-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), or 324-1(a)(15) commits a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a 4violation of subsection 24-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a 5Class 2 felony. The possession of each weapon or device in 6violation of this Section constitutes a single and separate 7violation.8    (c) Violations in specific places.9        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 10    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 11    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated 12    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 13    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 14    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the 15    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 16    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 17    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 18    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 19    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 20    comprising any public park, on the real property 21    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 22    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from 23    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 24    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 25    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 26    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse,   HB3577- 10 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    public transportation facility, or residential property 2    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 3    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 4    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 5    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 6    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.7        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 8    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of 9    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 10    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 11    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a 12    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 13    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 14    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year, 15    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 16    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 17    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 18    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 19    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 20    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 21    students to or from school or a school related activity, 22    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 23    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 24    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 25    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 26    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a   HB3577- 11 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 2    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 3    commits a Class 3 felony.4        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 5    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 6    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 7    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 8    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 9    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 10    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 11    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on 12    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 13    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 14    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 15    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 16    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 17    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 18    students to or from school or a school related activity, 19    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 20    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 21    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 22    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 23    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 24    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 25    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 26    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building   HB3577- 12 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 2    of this State for the conduct of official business.3        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 4    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers or 5    security officers of such school, college, or university 6    or to students carrying or possessing firearms for use in 7    training courses, parades, hunting, target shooting on 8    school ranges, or otherwise with the consent of school 9    authorities and which firearms are transported unloaded 10    enclosed in a suitable case, box, or transportation 11    package.12        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 13    means any public or private elementary or secondary 14    school, community college, college, or university.15        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 16    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 17    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 18    persons by means available to the general public, except 19    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance 20    of the general public as passengers; and "public 21    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 22    where one may obtain public transportation. 23    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 24omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 25subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 26possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying   HB3577- 13 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 2substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 3(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 4upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 5such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 6operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 7and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 8shall not apply to the driver.9    (e) Exemptions.10        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 11    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic 12    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 13    this Section.14        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 15    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 16    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 17    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 18    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 19    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not 20    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 21    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 22    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an 23    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 24    switchblade knives. 25(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 26103-822, eff. 1-1-25.)   HB3577- 14 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.6)2    Sec. 24-1.6. Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon. 3    (a) A person commits the offense of aggravated unlawful 4possession of a weapon when he or she knowingly:5        (1) Carries on or about his or her person or in any 6    vehicle or concealed on or about his or her person except 7    when on his or her land or in his or her abode, legal 8    dwelling, or fixed place of business, or on the land or in 9    the legal dwelling of another person as an invitee with 10    that person's permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun 11    or taser or other firearm; or12        (2) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 13    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 14    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village or 15    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 16    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 17    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his or 18    her own land or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or 19    fixed place of business, or on the land or in the legal 20    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 21    person's permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun or 22    taser or other firearm; and23        (3) One of the following factors is present:24            (A) the firearm, other than a pistol, revolver, or 25        handgun, possessed was uncased, loaded, and   HB3577- 15 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        immediately accessible at the time of the offense; or2            (A-5) the pistol, revolver, or handgun possessed 3        was uncased, loaded, and immediately accessible at the 4        time of the offense and the person possessing the 5        pistol, revolver, or handgun has not been issued a 6        currently valid license under the Firearm Concealed 7        Carry Act; or 8            (B) the firearm, other than a pistol, revolver, or 9        handgun, possessed was uncased, unloaded, and the 10        ammunition for the weapon was immediately accessible 11        at the time of the offense; or12            (B-5) the pistol, revolver, or handgun possessed 13        was uncased, unloaded, and the ammunition for the 14        weapon was immediately accessible at the time of the 15        offense and the person possessing the pistol, 16        revolver, or handgun has not been issued a currently 17        valid license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act; 18        or 19            (C) the person possessing the firearm has not been 20        issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 21        Identification Card; or22            (D) the person possessing the weapon was 23        previously adjudicated a delinquent minor under the 24        Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for an act that if committed 25        by an adult would be a felony; or26            (E) the person possessing the weapon was engaged   HB3577- 16 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        in a misdemeanor violation of the Cannabis Control 2        Act, in a misdemeanor violation of the Illinois 3        Controlled Substances Act, or in a misdemeanor 4        violation of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 5        Protection Act; or6            (F) (blank); or7            (G) the person possessing the weapon had an order 8        of protection issued against him or her within the 9        previous 2 years; or10            (H) the person possessing the weapon was engaged 11        in the commission or attempted commission of a 12        misdemeanor involving the use or threat of violence 13        against the person or property of another; or14            (I) the person possessing the weapon was under 21 15        years of age and in possession of a handgun, unless the 16        person under 21 is engaged in lawful activities under 17        the Wildlife Code or described in subsection 18        24-2(b)(1), (b)(3), or 24-2(f).19    (a-5) "Handgun" as used in this Section has the meaning 20given to it in Section 5 of the Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 21    (b) "Stun gun or taser" as used in this Section has the 22same definition given to it in Section 24-1 of this Code.23    (c) This Section does not apply to or affect the 24transportation or possession of weapons that:25        (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or26        (ii) are not immediately accessible; or  HB3577- 17 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 2    carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a person 3    who has been issued a currently valid Firearm Owner's 4    Identification Card.5    (d) Sentence.6        (1) Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon is a 7    Class 4 felony; a second or subsequent offense is a Class 2 8    felony for which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 9    imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 10    years, except as provided for in Section 5-4.5-110 of the 11    Unified Code of Corrections. 12        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and 13    (4) of this subsection (d), a first offense of aggravated 14    unlawful possession of a weapon committed with a firearm 15    by a person 18 years of age or older where the factors 16    listed in both items (A) and (C) or both items (A-5) and 17    (C) of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) are present is a 18    Class 4 felony, for which the person shall be sentenced to 19    a term of imprisonment of not less than one year and not 20    more than 3 years.21        (3) Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon by a 22    person who has been previously convicted of a felony in 23    this State or another jurisdiction is a Class 2 felony for 24    which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 25    imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 26    years, except as provided for in Section 5-4.5-110 of the   HB3577- 18 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    Unified Code of Corrections. 2        (4) Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon while 3    wearing or in possession of body armor as defined in 4    Section 33F-1 by a person who has not been issued a valid 5    Firearms Owner's Identification Card in accordance with 6    Section 5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 7    a Class X felony.8        (5) Aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon while 9    carrying or possessing a weapon that has been modified or 10    equipped with a forced reset trigger, including an 11    auto-switch or binary switch, or high-capacity magazine, 12    is a Class X felony. In this paragraph, "forced reset 13    trigger" and "high-capacity magazine" have the meanings 14    ascribed to them in subparagraphs (i) and (ii-5) of 15    paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1, 16    respectively.17    (e) The possession of each firearm in violation of this 18Section constitutes a single and separate violation.19(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 20    (720 ILCS 5/24-2)21    Sec. 24-2. Exemptions. 22    (a) Subsections 24-1(a)(3), 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(10), and 2324-1(a)(13) and Section 24-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of 24the following:25        (1) Peace officers, and any person summoned by a peace   HB3577- 19 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the 2    peace, while actually engaged in assisting such officer.3        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 4    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 5    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense, 6    while in the performance of their official duty, or while 7    commuting between their homes and places of employment.8        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 9    the United States or the Illinois National Guard or the 10    Reserve Officers Training Corps, while in the performance 11    of their official duty.12        (4) Special agents employed by a railroad or a public 13    utility to perform police functions, and guards of armored 14    car companies, while actually engaged in the performance 15    of the duties of their employment or commuting between 16    their homes and places of employment; and watchmen while 17    actually engaged in the performance of the duties of their 18    employment.19        (5) Persons licensed as private security contractors, 20    private detectives, or private alarm contractors, or 21    employed by a private security contractor, private 22    detective, or private alarm contractor agency licensed by 23    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, 24    if their duties include the carrying of a weapon under the 25    provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 26    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of   HB3577- 20 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    2004, while actually engaged in the performance of the 2    duties of their employment or commuting between their 3    homes and places of employment. A person shall be 4    considered eligible for this exemption if he or she has 5    completed the required 20 hours of training for a private 6    security contractor, private detective, or private alarm 7    contractor, or employee of a licensed private security 8    contractor, private detective, or private alarm contractor 9    agency and 28 hours of required firearm training, and has 10    been issued a firearm control card by the Department of 11    Financial and Professional Regulation. Conditions for the 12    renewal of firearm control cards issued under the 13    provisions of this Section shall be the same as for those 14    cards issued under the provisions of the Private 15    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 16    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 17    card shall be carried by the private security contractor, 18    private detective, or private alarm contractor, or 19    employee of the licensed private security contractor, 20    private detective, or private alarm contractor agency at 21    all times when he or she is in possession of a concealable 22    weapon permitted by his or her firearm control card.23        (6) Any person regularly employed in a commercial or 24    industrial operation as a security guard for the 25    protection of persons employed and private property 26    related to such commercial or industrial operation, while   HB3577- 21 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    actually engaged in the performance of his or her duty or 2    traveling between sites or properties belonging to the 3    employer, and who, as a security guard, is a member of a 4    security force registered with the Department of Financial 5    and Professional Regulation; provided that such security 6    guard has successfully completed a course of study, 7    approved by and supervised by the Department of Financial 8    and Professional Regulation, consisting of not less than 9    48 hours of training that includes the theory of law 10    enforcement, liability for acts, and the handling of 11    weapons. A person shall be considered eligible for this 12    exemption if he or she has completed the required 20 hours 13    of training for a security officer and 28 hours of 14    required firearm training, and has been issued a firearm 15    control card by the Department of Financial and 16    Professional Regulation. Conditions for the renewal of 17    firearm control cards issued under the provisions of this 18    Section shall be the same as for those cards issued under 19    the provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 20    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 21    2004. The firearm control card shall be carried by the 22    security guard at all times when he or she is in possession 23    of a concealable weapon permitted by his or her firearm 24    control card.25        (7) Agents and investigators of the Illinois 26    Legislative Investigating Commission authorized by the   HB3577- 22 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    Commission to carry the weapons specified in subsections 2    24-1(a)(3) and 24-1(a)(4), while on duty in the course of 3    any investigation for the Commission.4        (8) Persons employed by a financial institution as a 5    security guard for the protection of other employees and 6    property related to such financial institution, while 7    actually engaged in the performance of their duties, 8    commuting between their homes and places of employment, or 9    traveling between sites or properties owned or operated by 10    such financial institution, and who, as a security guard, 11    is a member of a security force registered with the 12    Department; provided that any person so employed has 13    successfully completed a course of study, approved by and 14    supervised by the Department of Financial and Professional 15    Regulation, consisting of not less than 48 hours of 16    training which includes theory of law enforcement, 17    liability for acts, and the handling of weapons. A person 18    shall be considered to be eligible for this exemption if 19    he or she has completed the required 20 hours of training 20    for a security officer and 28 hours of required firearm 21    training, and has been issued a firearm control card by 22    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. 23    Conditions for renewal of firearm control cards issued 24    under the provisions of this Section shall be the same as 25    for those issued under the provisions of the Private 26    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint   HB3577- 23 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 2    card shall be carried by the security guard at all times 3    when he or she is in possession of a concealable weapon 4    permitted by his or her firearm control card. For purposes 5    of this subsection, "financial institution" means a bank, 6    savings and loan association, credit union, or company 7    providing armored car services.8        (9) Any person employed by an armored car company to 9    drive an armored car, while actually engaged in the 10    performance of his duties.11        (10) Persons who have been classified as peace 12    officers pursuant to the Peace Officer Fire Investigation 13    Act.14        (11) Investigators of the Office of the State's 15    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor authorized by the board of 16    governors of the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 17    Prosecutor to carry weapons pursuant to Section 7.06 of 18    the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's Act.19        (12) Special investigators appointed by a State's 20    Attorney under Section 3-9005 of the Counties Code.21        (12.5) Probation officers while in the performance of 22    their duties, or while commuting between their homes, 23    places of employment or specific locations that are part 24    of their assigned duties, with the consent of the chief 25    judge of the circuit for which they are employed, if they 26    have received weapons training according to requirements   HB3577- 24 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    of the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm 2    Training Act.3        (13) Court security officers Security Officers while 4    in the performance of their official duties, or while 5    commuting between their homes and places of employment, 6    with the consent of the sheriff Sheriff.7        (13.5) A person employed as an armed security guard at 8    a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site or 9    facility regulated by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission 10    who has completed the background screening and training 11    mandated by the rules and regulations of the Nuclear 12    Regulatory Commission.13        (14) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of weapons 14    to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 15    (13.5) of this subsection to possess those weapons.16    (a-5) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 17to or affect any person carrying a concealed pistol, revolver, 18or handgun and the person has been issued a currently valid 19license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act at the time of 20the commission of the offense.21    (a-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 22to or affect a qualified current or retired law enforcement 23officer or a current or retired deputy, county correctional 24officer, or correctional officer of the Department of 25Corrections qualified under the laws of this State or under 26the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act.   HB3577- 25 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    (b) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 224-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of the following:3        (1) Members of any club or organization organized for 4    the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon 5    established target ranges, whether public or private, and 6    patrons of such ranges, while such members or patrons are 7    using their firearms on those target ranges.8        (2) Duly authorized military or civil organizations 9    while parading, with the special permission of the 10    Governor.11        (3) Hunters, trappers, or fishermen while engaged in 12    lawful hunting, trapping, or fishing under the provisions 13    of the Wildlife Code or the Fish and Aquatic Life Code.14        (4) Transportation of weapons that are broken down in 15    a non-functioning state or are not immediately accessible.16        (5) Carrying or possessing any pistol, revolver, stun 17    gun or taser or other firearm on the land or in the legal 18    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 19    person's permission. 20    (c) Subsections Subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i), (ii), (ii-5), 21and (iii) do does not apply to or affect any of the following:22        (1) Peace officers while in performance of their 23    official duties.24        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 25    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 26    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense.  HB3577- 26 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 2    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 3    the performance of their official duty.4        (4) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of machine 5    guns to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 6    (3) of this subsection to possess machine guns, if the 7    machine guns are broken down in a non-functioning state or 8    are not immediately accessible.9        (5) Persons licensed under federal law to manufacture 10    any weapon from which 8 or more shots or bullets can be 11    discharged by a single function of the firing device, or 12    ammunition for such weapons, and actually engaged in the 13    business of manufacturing such weapons or ammunition, but 14    only with respect to activities which are within the 15    lawful scope of such business, such as the manufacture, 16    transportation, or testing of such weapons or ammunition. 17    This exemption does not authorize the general private 18    possession of any weapon from which 8 or more shots or 19    bullets can be discharged by a single function of the 20    firing device, but only such possession and activities as 21    are within the lawful scope of a licensed manufacturing 22    business described in this paragraph.23        During transportation, such weapons shall be broken 24    down in a non-functioning state or not immediately 25    accessible.26        (6) The manufacture, transport, testing, delivery,   HB3577- 27 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    transfer, or sale, and all lawful commercial or 2    experimental activities necessary thereto, of rifles, 3    shotguns, and weapons made from rifles or shotguns, or 4    ammunition for such rifles, shotguns, or weapons, where 5    engaged in by a person operating as a contractor or 6    subcontractor pursuant to a contract or subcontract for 7    the development and supply of such rifles, shotguns, 8    weapons, or ammunition to the United States government or 9    any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, when 10    such activities are necessary and incident to fulfilling 11    the terms of such contract.12        The exemption granted under this subdivision (c)(6) 13    shall also apply to any authorized agent of any such 14    contractor or subcontractor who is operating within the 15    scope of his employment, where such activities involving 16    such weapon, weapons, or ammunition are necessary and 17    incident to fulfilling the terms of such contract.18        (7) A person possessing a rifle with a barrel or 19    barrels less than 16 inches in length if: (A) the person 20    has been issued a Curios and Relics license from the U.S. 21    Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; or 22    (B) the person is an active member of a bona fide, 23    nationally recognized military re-enacting group and the 24    modification is required and necessary to accurately 25    portray the weapon for historical re-enactment purposes; 26    the re-enactor is in possession of a valid and current   HB3577- 28 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    re-enacting group membership credential; and the overall 2    length of the weapon as modified is not less than 26 3    inches.4    (d) Subsection 24-1(a)(1) does not apply to the purchase, 5possession or carrying of a black-jack or slung-shot by a 6peace officer.7    (e) Subsection 24-1(a)(8) does not apply to any owner, 8manager, or authorized employee of any place specified in that 9subsection nor to any law enforcement officer.10    (f) Subsection 24-1(a)(4) and subsection 24-1(a)(10) and 11Section 24-1.6 do not apply to members of any club or 12organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting 13at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or 14private, while using their firearms on those target ranges.15    (g) Subsections 24-1(a)(11) and 24-3.1(a)(6) do not apply 16to:17        (1) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 18    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 19    the performance of their official duty.20        (2) Bonafide collectors of antique or surplus military 21    ordnance.22        (3) Laboratories having a department of forensic 23    ballistics, or specializing in the development of 24    ammunition or explosive ordnance.25        (4) Commerce, preparation, assembly, or possession of 26    explosive bullets by manufacturers of ammunition licensed   HB3577- 29 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    by the federal government, in connection with the supply 2    of those organizations and persons exempted by subdivision 3    (g)(1) of this Section, or like organizations and persons 4    outside this State, or the transportation of explosive 5    bullets to any organization or person exempted in this 6    Section by a common carrier or by a vehicle owned or leased 7    by an exempted manufacturer.8    (g-5) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to or affect 9persons licensed under federal law to manufacture any device 10or attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use 11in silencing the report of any firearm, firearms, or 12ammunition for those firearms equipped with those devices, and 13actually engaged in the business of manufacturing those 14devices, firearms, or ammunition, but only with respect to 15activities that are within the lawful scope of that business, 16such as the manufacture, transportation, or testing of those 17devices, firearms, or ammunition. This exemption does not 18authorize the general private possession of any device or 19attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use in 20silencing the report of any firearm, but only such possession 21and activities as are within the lawful scope of a licensed 22manufacturing business described in this subsection (g-5). 23During transportation, these devices shall be detached from 24any weapon or not immediately accessible.25    (g-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 2624-1.6 do not apply to or affect any parole agent or parole   HB3577- 30 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1supervisor who meets the qualifications and conditions 2prescribed in Section 3-14-1.5 of the Unified Code of 3Corrections. 4    (g-7) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to a peace 5officer while serving as a member of a tactical response team 6or special operations team. A peace officer may not personally 7own or apply for ownership of a device or attachment of any 8kind designed, used, or intended for use in silencing the 9report of any firearm. These devices shall be owned and 10maintained by lawfully recognized units of government whose 11duties include the investigation of criminal acts.12    (g-10) (Blank). 13    (h) An information or indictment based upon a violation of 14any subsection of this Article need not negate negative any 15exemptions contained in this Article. The defendant shall have 16the burden of proving such an exemption.17    (i) Nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 18affect the transportation, carrying, or possession, of any 19pistol or revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm 20consigned to a common carrier operating under license of the 21State of Illinois or the federal government, where such 22transportation, carrying, or possession is incident to the 23lawful transportation in which such common carrier is engaged; 24and nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 25affect the transportation, carrying, or possession of any 26pistol, revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm, not the   HB3577- 31 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1subject of and regulated by subsection 24-1(a)(7) or 2subsection 24-2(c) of this Article, which is unloaded and 3enclosed in a case, firearm carrying box, shipping box, or 4other container, by the possessor of a valid Firearm Owners 5Identification Card.6(Source: P.A. 102-152, eff. 1-1-22; 102-779, eff. 1-1-23; 7102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; revised 87-22-24.) 9    (720 ILCS 5/24-5.1)10    Sec. 24-5.1. Serialization of unfinished frames or 11receivers; prohibition on unserialized firearms; exceptions; 12penalties.13    (a) In this Section:14    "Bona fide supplier" means an established business entity 15engaged in the development and sale of firearms parts to one or 16more federal firearms manufacturers or federal firearms 17importers. 18    "Federal firearms dealer" means a licensed manufacturer 19pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(11).20    "Federal firearms importer" means a licensed importer 21pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(9).22    "Federal firearms manufacturer" means a licensed 23manufacturer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(10).24    "Frame or receiver" means a part of a firearm that, when 25the complete weapon is assembled, is visible from the exterior   HB3577- 32 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1and provides housing or a structure designed to hold or 2integrate one or more fire control components, even if pins or 3other attachments are required to connect those components to 4the housing or structure. For models of firearms in which 5multiple parts provide such housing or structure, the part or 6parts that the Director of the federal Bureau of Alcohol, 7Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives has determined are a frame or 8receiver constitute the frame or receiver. For purposes of 9this definition, "fire control component" means a component 10necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete, or continue 11the firing sequence, including any of the following: hammer, 12bolt, bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, 13firing pin, striker, or slide rails.14    "Security exemplar" means an object to be fabricated at 15the direction of the United States Attorney General that is 16(1) constructed of 3.7 ounces of material type 17-4 PH 17stainless steel in a shape resembling a handgun and (2) 18suitable for testing and calibrating metal detectors. 19    "Three-dimensional printer" means a computer or 20computer-drive machine capable of producing a 21three-dimensional object from a digital model.22    "Undetectable firearm" means (1) a firearm constructed 23entirely of non-metal substances; (2) a firearm that, after 24removal of all parts but the major components of the firearm, 25is not detectable by walk-through metal detectors calibrated 26and operated to detect the security exemplar; or (3) a firearm   HB3577- 33 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1that includes a major component of a firearm, which, if 2subject to the types of detection devices commonly used at 3airports for security screening, would not generate an image 4that accurately depicts the shape of the component. 5"Undetectable firearm" does not include a firearm subject to 6the provisions of 18 U.S.C. 922(p)(3) through (6). 7    "Unfinished frame or receiver" means any forging, casting, 8printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that:9        (1) has reached a stage in manufacture where it may 10    readily be completed, assembled, or converted to be a 11    functional firearm; or12        (2) is marketed or sold to the public to become or be 13    used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once 14    completed, assembled, or converted.15    "Unserialized" means lacking a serial number imprinted by:16        (1) a federal firearms manufacturer, federal firearms 17    importer, federal firearms dealer, or other federal 18    licensee authorized to provide marking services, pursuant 19    to a requirement under federal law; or20        (2) a federal firearms dealer or other federal 21    licensee authorized to provide marking services pursuant 22    to subsection (f) of this Section. 23    (b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly sell, offer 24to sell, or transfer an unserialized unfinished frame or 25receiver or unserialized firearm, including those produced 26using a three-dimensional printer, unless the party purchasing   HB3577- 34 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1or receiving the unfinished frame or receiver or unserialized 2firearm is a federal firearms importer, federal firearms 3manufacturer, or federal firearms dealer.4    (c) Beginning 180 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective 5date of Public Act 102-889), it is unlawful for any person to 6knowingly possess, transport, or receive an unfinished frame 7or receiver, unless:8        (1) the party possessing or receiving the unfinished 9    frame or receiver is a federal firearms importer or 10    federal firearms manufacturer;11        (2) the unfinished frame or receiver is possessed or 12    transported by a person for transfer to a federal firearms 13    importer or federal firearms manufacturer; or14        (3) the unfinished frame or receiver has been 15    imprinted with a serial number issued by a federal 16    firearms importer or federal firearms manufacturer in 17    compliance with subsection (f) of this Section. 18    (d) Beginning 180 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective 19date of Public Act 102-889), unless the party receiving the 20firearm is a federal firearms importer or federal firearms 21manufacturer, it is unlawful for any person to knowingly 22possess, purchase, transport, or receive a firearm that is not 23imprinted with a serial number by (1) a federal firearms 24importer or federal firearms manufacturer in compliance with 25all federal laws and regulations regulating the manufacture 26and import of firearms or (2) a federal firearms manufacturer,   HB3577- 35 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1federal firearms dealer, or other federal licensee authorized 2to provide marking services in compliance with the 3unserialized firearm serialization process under subsection 4(f) of this Section. 5    (e) Any firearm or unfinished frame or receiver 6manufactured using a three-dimensional printer must also be 7serialized in accordance with the requirements of subsection 8(f) within 30 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective date of 9Public Act 102-889), or prior to reaching a stage of 10manufacture where it may be readily completed, assembled, or 11converted to be a functional firearm.12    (f) Unserialized unfinished frames or receivers and 13unserialized firearms serialized pursuant to this Section 14shall be serialized in compliance with all of the following:15        (1) An unserialized unfinished frame or receiver and 16    unserialized firearm shall be serialized by a federally 17    licensed firearms dealer or other federal licensee 18    authorized to provide marking services with the licensee's 19    abbreviated federal firearms license number as a prefix 20    (which is the first 3 and last 5 digits) followed by a 21    hyphen, and then followed by a number as a suffix, such as 22    12345678-(number). The serial number or numbers must be 23    placed in a manner that accords with the requirements 24    under federal law for affixing serial numbers to firearms, 25    including the requirements that the serial number or 26    numbers be at the minimum size and depth, and not   HB3577- 36 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    susceptible to being readily obliterated, altered, or 2    removed, and the licensee must retain records that accord 3    with the requirements under federal law in the case of the 4    sale of a firearm. The imprinting of any serial number 5    upon an undetectable firearm must be done on a steel 6    plaque in compliance with 18 U.S.C. 922(p).7        (2) Every federally licensed firearms dealer or other 8    federal licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or 9    otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique 10    serial number pursuant to this Section shall maintain a 11    record of such indefinitely. Licensees subject to the 12    Firearm Dealer License Certification Act shall make all 13    records accessible for inspection upon the request of the 14    Illinois State Police or a law enforcement agency in 15    accordance with Section 5-35 of the Firearm Dealer License 16    Certification Act.17        (3) Every federally licensed firearms dealer or other 18    federal licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or 19    otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique 20    serial number pursuant to this Section shall record it at 21    the time of every transaction involving the transfer of a 22    firearm, rifle, shotgun, finished frame or receiver, or 23    unfinished frame or receiver that has been so marked in 24    compliance with the federal guidelines set forth in 27 CFR 25    478.124.26        (4) Every federally licensed firearms dealer or other   HB3577- 37 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    federal licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or 2    otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique 3    serial number pursuant to this Section shall review and 4    confirm the validity of the owner's Firearm Owner's 5    Identification Card issued under the Firearm Owners 6    Identification Card Act prior to returning the firearm to 7    the owner.8    (g) Within 30 days after May 18, 2022 (the effective date 9of Public Act 102-889), the Director of the Illinois State 10Police shall issue a public notice regarding the provisions of 11this Section. The notice shall include posting on the Illinois 12State Police website and may include written notification or 13any other means of communication statewide to all 14Illinois-based federal firearms manufacturers, federal 15firearms dealers, or other federal licensees authorized to 16provide marking services in compliance with the serialization 17process in subsection (f) in order to educate the public.18    (h) Exceptions. This Section does not apply to an 19unserialized unfinished frame or receiver or an unserialized 20firearm that:21        (1) has been rendered permanently inoperable;22        (2) is an antique firearm, as defined in 18 U.S.C. 23    921(a)(16);24        (3) was manufactured prior to October 22, 1968;25        (4) is an unfinished frame or receiver and is 26    possessed by a bona fide supplier exclusively for transfer   HB3577- 38 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    to a federal firearms manufacturer or federal firearms 2    importer, or is possessed by a federal firearms 3    manufacturer or federal firearms importer in compliance 4    with all federal laws and regulations regulating the 5    manufacture and import of firearms; except this exemption 6    does not apply if an unfinished frame or receiver is 7    possessed for transfer or is transferred to a person other 8    than a federal firearms manufacturer or federal firearms 9    importer; or 10        (5) is possessed by a person who received the 11    unserialized unfinished frame or receiver or unserialized 12    firearm through inheritance, and is not otherwise 13    prohibited from possessing the unserialized unfinished 14    frame or receiver or unserialized firearm, for a period 15    not exceeding 30 days after inheriting the unserialized 16    unfinished frame or receiver or unserialized firearm. 17    (i) Penalties.18        (1) A person who violates subsection (c) or (d) is 19    guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first violation and 20    is guilty of a Class 3 felony for a second or subsequent 21    violation.22        (2) A person who violates subsection (b) is guilty of 23    a Class 2 4 felony for a first violation and is guilty of a 24    Class 1 2 felony for a second or subsequent violation.25(Source: P.A. 102-889, eff. 5-18-22; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB3577- 39 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 2changing Sections 5-5-3.2 and 5-8-1 as follows: 3    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3.2)4    Sec. 5-5-3.2. Factors in aggravation and extended-term 5sentencing. 6    (a) The following factors shall be accorded weight in 7favor of imposing a term of imprisonment or may be considered 8by the court as reasons to impose a more severe sentence under 9Section 5-8-1 or Article 4.5 of Chapter V:10        (1) the defendant's conduct caused or threatened 11    serious harm;12        (2) the defendant received compensation for committing 13    the offense;14        (3) the defendant has a history of prior delinquency 15    or criminal activity;16        (4) the defendant, by the duties of his office or by 17    his position, was obliged to prevent the particular 18    offense committed or to bring the offenders committing it 19    to justice;20        (5) the defendant held public office at the time of 21    the offense, and the offense related to the conduct of 22    that office;23        (6) the defendant utilized his professional reputation 24    or position in the community to commit the offense, or to 25    afford him an easier means of committing it;  HB3577- 40 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (7) the sentence is necessary to deter others from 2    committing the same crime;3        (8) the defendant committed the offense against a 4    person 60 years of age or older or such person's property;5        (9) the defendant committed the offense against a 6    person who has a physical disability or such person's 7    property;8        (10) by reason of another individual's actual or 9    perceived race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, gender, 10    sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or 11    national origin, the defendant committed the offense 12    against (i) the person or property of that individual; 13    (ii) the person or property of a person who has an 14    association with, is married to, or has a friendship with 15    the other individual; or (iii) the person or property of a 16    relative (by blood or marriage) of a person described in 17    clause (i) or (ii). For the purposes of this Section, 18    "sexual orientation" has the meaning ascribed to it in 19    paragraph (O-1) of Section 1-103 of the Illinois Human 20    Rights Act;21        (11) the offense took place in a place of worship or on 22    the grounds of a place of worship, immediately prior to, 23    during or immediately following worship services. For 24    purposes of this subparagraph, "place of worship" shall 25    mean any church, synagogue or other building, structure or 26    place used primarily for religious worship;  HB3577- 41 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (12) the defendant was convicted of a felony committed 2    while he was on pretrial release or his own recognizance 3    pending trial for a prior felony and was convicted of such 4    prior felony, or the defendant was convicted of a felony 5    committed while he was serving a period of probation, 6    conditional discharge, or mandatory supervised release 7    under subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1 for a prior felony;8        (13) the defendant committed or attempted to commit a 9    felony while he was wearing a bulletproof vest. For the 10    purposes of this paragraph (13), a bulletproof vest is any 11    device which is designed for the purpose of protecting the 12    wearer from bullets, shot or other lethal projectiles;13        (14) the defendant held a position of trust or 14    supervision such as, but not limited to, family member as 15    defined in Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 16    teacher, scout leader, baby sitter, or day care worker, in 17    relation to a victim under 18 years of age, and the 18    defendant committed an offense in violation of Section 19    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-11, 20    11-14.4 except for an offense that involves keeping a 21    place of juvenile prostitution, 11-15.1, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 22    11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15 23    or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 24    of 2012 against that victim;25        (15) the defendant committed an offense related to the 26    activities of an organized gang. For the purposes of this   HB3577- 42 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    factor, "organized gang" has the meaning ascribed to it in 2    Section 10 of the Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention 3    Act;4        (16) the defendant committed an offense in violation 5    of one of the following Sections while in a school, 6    regardless of the time of day or time of year; on any 7    conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a school to 8    transport students to or from school or a school related 9    activity; on the real property of a school; or on a public 10    way within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising any 11    school: Section 10-1, 10-2, 10-5, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 12    11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-14.4, 11-15.1, 11-17.1, 13    11-18.1, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12-2, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 14    12-4.3, 12-6, 12-6.1, 12-6.5, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 15    12-15, 12-16, 18-2, or 33A-2, or Section 12-3.05 except 16    for subdivision (a)(4) or (g)(1), of the Criminal Code of 17    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;18        (16.5) the defendant committed an offense in violation 19    of one of the following Sections while in a day care 20    center, regardless of the time of day or time of year; on 21    the real property of a day care center, regardless of the 22    time of day or time of year; or on a public way within 23    1,000 feet of the real property comprising any day care 24    center, regardless of the time of day or time of year: 25    Section 10-1, 10-2, 10-5, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 26    11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-14.4, 11-15.1, 11-17.1, 11-18.1,   HB3577- 43 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12-2, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 12-4.3, 2    12-6, 12-6.1, 12-6.5, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 3    18-2, or 33A-2, or Section 12-3.05 except for subdivision 4    (a)(4) or (g)(1), of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 5    Criminal Code of 2012;6        (17) the defendant committed the offense by reason of 7    any person's activity as a community policing volunteer or 8    to prevent any person from engaging in activity as a 9    community policing volunteer. For the purpose of this 10    Section, "community policing volunteer" has the meaning 11    ascribed to it in Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 12    2012;13        (18) the defendant committed the offense in a nursing 14    home or on the real property comprising a nursing home. 15    For the purposes of this paragraph (18), "nursing home" 16    means a skilled nursing or intermediate long term care 17    facility that is subject to license by the Illinois 18    Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care 19    Act, the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 20    2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act;21        (19) the defendant was a federally licensed firearm 22    dealer and was previously convicted of a violation of 23    subsection (a) of Section 3 of the Firearm Owners 24    Identification Card Act and has now committed either a 25    felony violation of the Firearm Owners Identification Card 26    Act or an act of armed violence while armed with a firearm;  HB3577- 44 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (20) the defendant (i) committed the offense of 2    reckless homicide under Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code 3    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or the offense of 4    driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug or 5    drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 6    combination thereof under Section 11-501 of the Illinois 7    Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance 8    and (ii) was operating a motor vehicle in excess of 20 9    miles per hour over the posted speed limit as provided in 10    Article VI of Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; 11        (21) the defendant (i) committed the offense of 12    reckless driving or aggravated reckless driving under 13    Section 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and (ii) was 14    operating a motor vehicle in excess of 20 miles per hour 15    over the posted speed limit as provided in Article VI of 16    Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code;17        (22) the defendant committed the offense against a 18    person that the defendant knew, or reasonably should have 19    known, was a member of the Armed Forces of the United 20    States serving on active duty. For purposes of this clause 21    (22), the term "Armed Forces" means any of the Armed 22    Forces of the United States, including a member of any 23    reserve component thereof or National Guard unit called to 24    active duty; 25        (23) the defendant committed the offense against a 26    person who was elderly or infirm or who was a person with a   HB3577- 45 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    disability by taking advantage of a family or fiduciary 2    relationship with the elderly or infirm person or person 3    with a disability; 4        (24) the defendant committed any offense under Section 5    11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 6    of 2012 and possessed 100 or more images; 7        (25) the defendant committed the offense while the 8    defendant or the victim was in a train, bus, or other 9    vehicle used for public transportation;10        (26) the defendant committed the offense of child 11    pornography or aggravated child pornography, specifically 12    including paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7) of 13    subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 14    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 where a child engaged in, 15    solicited for, depicted in, or posed in any act of sexual 16    penetration or bound, fettered, or subject to sadistic, 17    masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in a sexual context 18    and specifically including paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), 19    (5), or (7) of subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1B or 20    Section 11-20.3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 where a child 21    engaged in, solicited for, depicted in, or posed in any 22    act of sexual penetration or bound, fettered, or subject 23    to sadistic, masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in a 24    sexual context;25        (26.5) the defendant committed the offense of obscene 26    depiction of a purported child, specifically including   HB3577- 46 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 2    Criminal Code of 2012 if a child engaged in, solicited 3    for, depicted in, or posed in any act of sexual 4    penetration or bound, fettered, or subject to sadistic, 5    masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in a sexual context; 6        (27) the defendant committed the offense of first 7    degree murder, assault, aggravated assault, battery, 8    aggravated battery, robbery, armed robbery, or aggravated 9    robbery against a person who was a veteran and the 10    defendant knew, or reasonably should have known, that the 11    person was a veteran performing duties as a representative 12    of a veterans' organization. For the purposes of this 13    paragraph (27), "veteran" means an Illinois resident who 14    has served as a member of the United States Armed Forces, a 15    member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 16    United States Reserve Forces; and "veterans' organization" 17    means an organization comprised of members of which 18    substantially all are individuals who are veterans or 19    spouses, widows, or widowers of veterans, the primary 20    purpose of which is to promote the welfare of its members 21    and to provide assistance to the general public in such a 22    way as to confer a public benefit; 23        (28) the defendant committed the offense of assault, 24    aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, robbery, 25    armed robbery, or aggravated robbery against a person that 26    the defendant knew or reasonably should have known was a   HB3577- 47 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    letter carrier or postal worker while that person was 2    performing his or her duties delivering mail for the 3    United States Postal Service;4        (29) the defendant committed the offense of criminal 5    sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 6    criminal sexual abuse, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse 7    against a victim with an intellectual disability, and the 8    defendant holds a position of trust, authority, or 9    supervision in relation to the victim;10        (30) the defendant committed the offense of promoting 11    juvenile prostitution, patronizing a prostitute, or 12    patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution and at the 13    time of the commission of the offense knew that the 14    prostitute or minor engaged in prostitution was in the 15    custody or guardianship of the Department of Children and 16    Family Services;17        (31) the defendant (i) committed the offense of 18    driving while under the influence of alcohol, other drug 19    or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 20    combination thereof in violation of Section 11-501 of the 21    Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a local 22    ordinance and (ii) the defendant during the commission of 23    the offense was driving his or her vehicle upon a roadway 24    designated for one-way traffic in the opposite direction 25    of the direction indicated by official traffic control 26    devices;   HB3577- 48 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (32) the defendant committed the offense of reckless 2    homicide while committing a violation of Section 11-907 of 3    the Illinois Vehicle Code; 4        (33) the defendant was found guilty of an 5    administrative infraction related to an act or acts of 6    public indecency or sexual misconduct in the penal 7    institution. In this paragraph (33), "penal institution" 8    has the same meaning as in Section 2-14 of the Criminal 9    Code of 2012; or10        (34) the defendant committed the offense of leaving 11    the scene of a crash in violation of subsection (b) of 12    Section 11-401 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and the crash 13    resulted in the death of a person and at the time of the 14    offense, the defendant was: (i) driving under the 15    influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating 16    compound or compounds or any combination thereof as 17    defined by Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; or 18    (ii) operating the motor vehicle while using an electronic 19    communication device as defined in Section 12-610.2 of the 20    Illinois Vehicle Code. 21    For the purposes of this Section:22    "School" is defined as a public or private elementary or 23secondary school, community college, college, or university.24    "Day care center" means a public or private State 25certified and licensed day care center as defined in Section 262.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969 that displays a sign in   HB3577- 49 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1plain view stating that the property is a day care center.2    "Intellectual disability" means significantly subaverage 3intellectual functioning which exists concurrently with 4impairment in adaptive behavior. 5    "Public transportation" means the transportation or 6conveyance of persons by means available to the general 7public, and includes paratransit services.8    "Traffic control devices" means all signs, signals, 9markings, and devices that conform to the Illinois Manual on 10Uniform Traffic Control Devices, placed or erected by 11authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, 12for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic. 13    (b) The following factors, related to all felonies, may be 14considered by the court as reasons to impose an extended term 15sentence under Section 5-8-2 upon any offender:16        (1) When a defendant is convicted of any felony, after 17    having been previously convicted in Illinois or any other 18    jurisdiction of the same or similar class felony or 19    greater class felony, when such conviction has occurred 20    within 10 years after the previous conviction, excluding 21    time spent in custody, and such charges are separately 22    brought and tried and arise out of different series of 23    acts; or24        (2) When a defendant is convicted of any felony and 25    the court finds that the offense was accompanied by 26    exceptionally brutal or heinous behavior indicative of   HB3577- 50 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    wanton cruelty; or2        (3) When a defendant is convicted of any felony 3    committed against:4            (i) a person under 12 years of age at the time of 5        the offense or such person's property;6            (ii) a person 60 years of age or older at the time 7        of the offense or such person's property; or8            (iii) a person who had a physical disability at 9        the time of the offense or such person's property; or10        (4) When a defendant is convicted of any felony and 11    the offense involved any of the following types of 12    specific misconduct committed as part of a ceremony, rite, 13    initiation, observance, performance, practice or activity 14    of any actual or ostensible religious, fraternal, or 15    social group:16            (i) the brutalizing or torturing of humans or 17        animals;18            (ii) the theft of human corpses;19            (iii) the kidnapping of humans;20            (iv) the desecration of any cemetery, religious, 21        fraternal, business, governmental, educational, or 22        other building or property; or23            (v) ritualized abuse of a child; or24        (5) When a defendant is convicted of a felony other 25    than conspiracy and the court finds that the felony was 26    committed under an agreement with 2 or more other persons   HB3577- 51 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    to commit that offense and the defendant, with respect to 2    the other individuals, occupied a position of organizer, 3    supervisor, financier, or any other position of management 4    or leadership, and the court further finds that the felony 5    committed was related to or in furtherance of the criminal 6    activities of an organized gang or was motivated by the 7    defendant's leadership in an organized gang; or8        (6) When a defendant is convicted of an offense 9    committed while using a firearm with a laser sight 10    attached to it. For purposes of this paragraph, "laser 11    sight" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 26-7 of 12    the Criminal Code of 2012; or13        (7) When a defendant who was at least 17 years of age 14    at the time of the commission of the offense is convicted 15    of a felony and has been previously adjudicated a 16    delinquent minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for 17    an act that if committed by an adult would be a Class X or 18    Class 1 felony when the conviction has occurred within 10 19    years after the previous adjudication, excluding time 20    spent in custody; or21        (8) When a defendant commits any felony and the 22    defendant used, possessed, exercised control over, or 23    otherwise directed an animal to assault a law enforcement 24    officer engaged in the execution of his or her official 25    duties or in furtherance of the criminal activities of an 26    organized gang in which the defendant is engaged; or   HB3577- 52 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (9) When a defendant commits any felony and the 2    defendant knowingly video or audio records the offense 3    with the intent to disseminate the recording. 4    (c) The following factors may be considered by the court 5as reasons to impose an extended term sentence under Section 65-8-2 (730 ILCS 5/5-8-2) upon any offender for the listed 7offenses:8        (1) When a defendant is convicted of first degree 9    murder, after having been previously convicted in Illinois 10    of any offense listed under paragraph (c)(2) of Section 11    5-5-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3), when that conviction has 12    occurred within 10 years after the previous conviction, 13    excluding time spent in custody, and the charges are 14    separately brought and tried and arise out of different 15    series of acts.16        (1.5) When a defendant is convicted of first degree 17    murder, after having been previously convicted of domestic 18    battery (720 ILCS 5/12-3.2) or aggravated domestic battery 19    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.3) committed on the same victim or after 20    having been previously convicted of violation of an order 21    of protection (720 ILCS 5/12-30) in which the same victim 22    was the protected person. 23        (2) When a defendant is convicted of voluntary 24    manslaughter, second degree murder, involuntary 25    manslaughter, or reckless homicide in which the defendant 26    has been convicted of causing the death of more than one   HB3577- 53 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    individual.2        (3) When a defendant is convicted of aggravated 3    criminal sexual assault or criminal sexual assault, when 4    there is a finding that aggravated criminal sexual assault 5    or criminal sexual assault was also committed on the same 6    victim by one or more other individuals, and the defendant 7    voluntarily participated in the crime with the knowledge 8    of the participation of the others in the crime, and the 9    commission of the crime was part of a single course of 10    conduct during which there was no substantial change in 11    the nature of the criminal objective.12        (4) If the victim was under 18 years of age at the time 13    of the commission of the offense, when a defendant is 14    convicted of aggravated criminal sexual assault or 15    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child under 16    subsection (a)(1) of Section 11-1.40 or subsection (a)(1) 17    of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 18    Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/11-1.40 or 5/12-14.1).19        (5) When a defendant is convicted of a felony 20    violation of Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 21    the Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/24-1) and there is a 22    finding that the defendant is a member of an organized 23    gang.24        (6) When a defendant was convicted of unlawful 25    possession of weapons under Section 24-1 of the Criminal 26    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/24-1)   HB3577- 54 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    for possessing a weapon that is not readily 2    distinguishable as one of the weapons enumerated in 3    Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 4    Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/24-1).5        (7) When a defendant is convicted of an offense 6    involving the illegal manufacture of a controlled 7    substance under Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 8    Substances Act (720 ILCS 570/401), the illegal manufacture 9    of methamphetamine under Section 25 of the Methamphetamine 10    Control and Community Protection Act (720 ILCS 646/25), or 11    the illegal possession of explosives and an emergency 12    response officer in the performance of his or her duties 13    is killed or injured at the scene of the offense while 14    responding to the emergency caused by the commission of 15    the offense. In this paragraph, "emergency" means a 16    situation in which a person's life, health, or safety is 17    in jeopardy; and "emergency response officer" means a 18    peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 19    emergency medical technician-ambulance, emergency medical 20    technician-intermediate, emergency medical 21    technician-paramedic, ambulance driver, other medical 22    assistance or first aid personnel, or hospital emergency 23    room personnel. 24        (8) When the defendant is convicted of attempted mob 25    action, solicitation to commit mob action, or conspiracy 26    to commit mob action under Section 8-1, 8-2, or 8-4 of the   HB3577- 55 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    Criminal Code of 2012, where the criminal object is a 2    violation of Section 25-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 3    and an electronic communication is used in the commission 4    of the offense. For the purposes of this paragraph (8), 5    "electronic communication" shall have the meaning provided 6    in Section 26.5-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 7        (9) When a defendant is convicted of unlawful 8    possession of weapons under Section 24-1 or aggravated 9    unlawful possession of a weapon under Section 24-1.6 of 10    the Criminal Code of 2012 and the weapon possessed was a 11    machine gun as defined in subparagraph (i) of paragraph 12    (7) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of that Code or was 13    modified or equipped with a forced reset trigger, 14    including an auto-switch or binary switch, or 15    high-capacity magazine.16        (10) When a defendant is convicted of a violent crime 17    as defined in Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and 18    Witnesses Act and a machine gun, as defined in 19    subparagraph (i) of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of 20    Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or a firearm 21    that was modified or equipped with a forced reset trigger, 22    including an auto-switch or binary switch or high-capacity 23    magazine was used in the commission of the crime.24        (11) When a defendant is convicted of unlawful 25    possession of weapons under Section 24-1 of the Criminal 26    Code of 2012 and the weapon possessed is a firearm in which   HB3577- 56 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    the frame or receiver of the firearm possessed was not 2    imprinted with a serial number.3        (12) When a defendant is convicted of a violent crime 4    as defined in Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and 5    Witnesses Act, and a firearm was used in the commission of 6    the offense and the frame or receiver of the firearm 7    possessed was not imprinted with a serial number.8    (c-1) For the purposes of paragraphs (9) and (10) of 9subsection (c), the General Assembly finds and declares that 10machine gun conversion switches present an extraordinary 11threat to public safety, as they can be readily made using a 3D 12printer and can quickly turn a firearm into a fully automatic 13weapon. A firearm equipped with a high-capacity magazine can 14be said to have significantly more firepower than a 15semi-automatic firearm because it can fire a significantly 16larger number of shots without reloading. Additionally, the 17use of firearms equipped with machine gun switches that allow 18firearms to fire automatically increases the risk of harm to 19innocent bystanders. High-capacity magazines that enable 20individuals to fire numerous rounds without reloading increase 21the potential for mass casualties. Firearms equipped with such 22devices pose a greater danger to the community due to the 23increased frequency with which they are reported to being used 24in the commission of violent crimes all over the country. By 25enhancing penalties for use of such firearms, the General 26Assembly seeks to: reduce the risk of gun violence and mass   HB3577- 57 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1casualties; to protect first responders and law enforcement 2from facing enhanced firepower; and to prevent circumvention 3of gun safety laws in Illinois; and to reduce the risk of 4fatalities in shootings. 5    (c-2) For the purposes of paragraphs (11) and (12) of 6subsection (c), the General Assembly finds and declares that 7the use of firearms that are not marked with serial numbers 8poses a greater danger to the community due to the increased 9frequency with which they are used in the commission of 10violent crimes and the difficulty of tracing such firearms. 11Because there is an increased market for these types of 12weapons for use in the commission of criminal activity, 13providing for stricter penalties for the possession and use of 14firearms not marked with serial numbers or "ghost guns" by 15individuals not authorized to possess or carry any firearms 16will help deter similar crimes. 17    (d) For the purposes of this Section, "organized gang" has 18the meaning ascribed to it in Section 10 of the Illinois 19Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.20    (d-1) For the purposes of paragraphs (9) and (10) of 21subsection (c), "forced reset trigger" and "high-capacity 22magazine" have the meanings ascribed to them in subparagraphs 23(i) and (ii-5) of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2424-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, respectively.25    (d-2) For the purposes of paragraphs (11) and (12) of 26subsection (c), firearm" does not include an antique firearm,   HB3577- 58 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(16) or any firearm that was 2manufactured prior to October 22, 1968. 3    (e) The court may impose an extended term sentence under 4Article 4.5 of Chapter V upon an offender who has been 5convicted of a felony violation of Section 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 611-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 712-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 8when the victim of the offense is under 18 years of age at the 9time of the commission of the offense and, during the 10commission of the offense, the victim was under the influence 11of alcohol, regardless of whether or not the alcohol was 12supplied by the offender; and the offender, at the time of the 13commission of the offense, knew or should have known that the 14victim had consumed alcohol. 15(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 16103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 17    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1)18    Sec. 5-8-1. Natural life imprisonment; enhancements for 19use of a firearm; mandatory supervised release terms. 20    (a) Except as otherwise provided in the statute defining 21the offense or in Article 4.5 of Chapter V, a sentence of 22imprisonment for a felony shall be a determinate sentence set 23by the court under this Section, subject to Section 5-4.5-115 24of this Code, according to the following limitations:25        (1) for first degree murder,  HB3577- 59 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            (a) (blank),2            (b) if a trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable 3        doubt that the murder was accompanied by exceptionally 4        brutal or heinous behavior indicative of wanton 5        cruelty or, except as set forth in subsection 6        (a)(1)(c) of this Section, that any of the aggravating 7        factors listed in subparagraph (b-5) are present, the 8        court may sentence the defendant, subject to Section 9        5-4.5-105, to a term of natural life imprisonment, or10            (b-5) a A defendant who at the time of the 11        commission of the offense has attained the age of 18 or 12        more and who has been found guilty of first degree 13        murder may be sentenced to a term of natural life 14        imprisonment if: 15                (1) the murdered individual was an inmate at 16            an institution or facility of the Department of 17            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 18            agency and was killed on the grounds thereof, or 19            the murdered individual was otherwise present in 20            such institution or facility with the knowledge 21            and approval of the chief administrative officer 22            thereof; 23                (2) the murdered individual was killed as a 24            result of the hijacking of an airplane, train, 25            ship, bus, or other public conveyance; 26                (3) the defendant committed the murder   HB3577- 60 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            pursuant to a contract, agreement, or 2            understanding by which he or she was to receive 3            money or anything of value in return for 4            committing the murder or procured another to 5            commit the murder for money or anything of value; 6                (4) the murdered individual was killed in the 7            course of another felony if: 8                    (A) the murdered individual: 9                        (i) was actually killed by the 10                    defendant, or 11                        (ii) received physical injuries 12                    personally inflicted by the defendant 13                    substantially contemporaneously with 14                    physical injuries caused by one or more 15                    persons for whose conduct the defendant is 16                    legally accountable under Section 5-2 of 17                    this Code, and the physical injuries 18                    inflicted by either the defendant or the 19                    other person or persons for whose conduct 20                    he is legally accountable caused the death 21                    of the murdered individual; and (B) in 22                    performing the acts which caused the death 23                    of the murdered individual or which 24                    resulted in physical injuries personally 25                    inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 26                    individual under the circumstances of   HB3577- 61 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1                    subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this 2                    clause (4), the defendant acted with the 3                    intent to kill the murdered individual or 4                    with the knowledge that his or her acts 5                    created a strong probability of death or 6                    great bodily harm to the murdered 7                    individual or another; and 8                    (B) in performing the acts which caused 9                the death of the murdered individual or which 10                resulted in physical injuries personally 11                inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 12                individual under the circumstances of 13                subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this clause 14                (4), the defendant acted with the intent to 15                kill the murdered individual or with the 16                knowledge that his or her acts created a 17                strong probability of death or great bodily 18                harm to the murdered individual or another; 19                and 20                    (C) the other felony was an inherently 21                violent crime or the attempt to commit an 22                inherently violent crime. In this clause (C), 23                "inherently violent crime" includes, but is 24                not limited to, armed robbery, robbery, 25                predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 26                aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated   HB3577- 62 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1                kidnapping, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 2                aggravated arson, aggravated stalking, 3                residential burglary, and home invasion; 4                (5) the defendant committed the murder with 5            intent to prevent the murdered individual from 6            testifying or participating in any criminal 7            investigation or prosecution or giving material 8            assistance to the State in any investigation or 9            prosecution, either against the defendant or 10            another; or the defendant committed the murder 11            because the murdered individual was a witness in 12            any prosecution or gave material assistance to the 13            State in any investigation or prosecution, either 14            against the defendant or another; for purposes of 15            this clause (5), "participating in any criminal 16            investigation or prosecution" is intended to 17            include those appearing in the proceedings in any 18            capacity such as trial judges, prosecutors, 19            defense attorneys, investigators, witnesses, or 20            jurors; 21                (6) the defendant, while committing an offense 22            punishable under Section 401, 401.1, 401.2, 405, 23            405.2, 407, or 407.1 or subsection (b) of Section 24            404 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 25            while engaged in a conspiracy or solicitation to 26            commit such offense, intentionally killed an   HB3577- 63 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            individual or counseled, commanded, induced, 2            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 3            murdered individual; 4                (7) the defendant was incarcerated in an 5            institution or facility of the Department of 6            Corrections at the time of the murder, and while 7            committing an offense punishable as a felony under 8            Illinois law, or while engaged in a conspiracy or 9            solicitation to commit such offense, intentionally 10            killed an individual or counseled, commanded, 11            induced, procured, or caused the intentional 12            killing of the murdered individual; 13                (8) the murder was committed in a cold, 14            calculated and premeditated manner pursuant to a 15            preconceived plan, scheme, or design to take a 16            human life by unlawful means, and the conduct of 17            the defendant created a reasonable expectation 18            that the death of a human being would result 19            therefrom; 20                (9) the defendant was a principal 21            administrator, organizer, or leader of a 22            calculated criminal drug conspiracy consisting of 23            a hierarchical position of authority superior to 24            that of all other members of the conspiracy, and 25            the defendant counseled, commanded, induced, 26            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the   HB3577- 64 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            murdered person; 2                (10) the murder was intentional and involved 3            the infliction of torture. For the purpose of this 4            clause (10), torture means the infliction of or 5            subjection to extreme physical pain, motivated by 6            an intent to increase or prolong the pain, 7            suffering, or agony of the victim; 8                (11) the murder was committed as a result of 9            the intentional discharge of a firearm by the 10            defendant from a motor vehicle and the victim was 11            not present within the motor vehicle; 12                (12) the murdered individual was a person with 13            a disability and the defendant knew or should have 14            known that the murdered individual was a person 15            with a disability. For purposes of this clause 16            (12), "person with a disability" means a person 17            who suffers from a permanent physical or mental 18            impairment resulting from disease, an injury, a 19            functional disorder, or a congenital condition 20            that renders the person incapable of adequately 21            providing for his or her own health or personal 22            care; 23                (13) the murdered individual was subject to an 24            order of protection and the murder was committed 25            by a person against whom the same order of 26            protection was issued under the Illinois Domestic   HB3577- 65 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            Violence Act of 1986; 2                (14) the murdered individual was known by the 3            defendant to be a teacher or other person employed 4            in any school and the teacher or other employee is 5            upon the grounds of a school or grounds adjacent 6            to a school, or is in any part of a building used 7            for school purposes; 8                (15) the murder was committed by the defendant 9            in connection with or as a result of the offense of 10            terrorism as defined in Section 29D-14.9 of this 11            Code; 12                (16) the murdered individual was a member of a 13            congregation engaged in prayer or other religious 14            activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or 15            other building, structure, or place used for 16            religious worship; or 17                (17)(i) the murdered individual was a 18            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 19            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse; 20                (ii) the defendant knew or should have known 21            that the murdered individual was a physician, 22            physician assistant, psychologist, nurse, or 23            advanced practice registered nurse; and 24                (iii) the murdered individual was killed in 25            the course of acting in his or her capacity as a 26            physician, physician assistant, psychologist,   HB3577- 66 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, or 2            to prevent him or her from acting in that 3            capacity, or in retaliation for his or her acting 4            in that capacity. 5            (c) the court shall sentence the defendant to a 6        term of natural life imprisonment if the defendant, at 7        the time of the commission of the murder, had attained 8        the age of 18, and: 9                (i) has previously been convicted of first 10            degree murder under any state or federal law, or11                (ii) is found guilty of murdering more than 12            one victim, or13                (iii) is found guilty of murdering a peace 14            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 15            when the peace officer, fireman, or emergency 16            management worker was killed in the course of 17            performing his official duties, or to prevent the 18            peace officer or fireman from performing his 19            official duties, or in retaliation for the peace 20            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 21            from performing his official duties, and the 22            defendant knew or should have known that the 23            murdered individual was a peace officer, fireman, 24            or emergency management worker, or25                (iv) is found guilty of murdering an employee 26            of an institution or facility of the Department of   HB3577- 67 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 2            agency, when the employee was killed in the course 3            of performing his official duties, or to prevent 4            the employee from performing his official duties, 5            or in retaliation for the employee performing his 6            official duties, or7                (v) is found guilty of murdering an emergency 8            medical technician - ambulance, emergency medical 9            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 10            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 11            medical assistance or first aid person while 12            employed by a municipality or other governmental 13            unit when the person was killed in the course of 14            performing official duties or to prevent the 15            person from performing official duties or in 16            retaliation for performing official duties and the 17            defendant knew or should have known that the 18            murdered individual was an emergency medical 19            technician - ambulance, emergency medical 20            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 21            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 22            medical assistant or first aid personnel, or23                (vi) (blank), or24                (vii) is found guilty of first degree murder 25            and the murder was committed by reason of any 26            person's activity as a community policing   HB3577- 68 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1            volunteer or to prevent any person from engaging 2            in activity as a community policing volunteer. For 3            the purpose of this Section, "community policing 4            volunteer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 5            Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.6            For purposes of clause (v), "emergency medical 7        technician - ambulance", "emergency medical technician -8         intermediate", and "emergency medical technician - 9        paramedic", have the meanings ascribed to them in the 10        Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.11            (d)(i) if the person committed the offense while 12            armed with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to 13            the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;14            (ii) if, during the commission of the offense, the 15        person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall 16        be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 17        court;18            (iii) if, during the commission of the offense, 19        the person personally discharged a firearm that 20        proximately caused great bodily harm, permanent 21        disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 22        another person, 25 years or up to a term of natural 23        life shall be added to the term of imprisonment 24        imposed by the court.25            (e) if the firearm used to commit the offense in 26        subsection (d) was outfitted with parts designed or   HB3577- 69 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 2        machine gun or a high-capacity magazine, 5 consecutive 3        years shall be added on to the years added by 4        subsection (d). As used in this subsection, "machine 5        gun" and "high-capacity magazine" have the meanings 6        ascribed to them in subparagraph (7) of subsection (a) 7        of Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 8        (2) (blank);9        (2.5) for a person who has attained the age of 18 years 10    at the time of the commission of the offense and who is 11    convicted under the circumstances described in subdivision 12    (b)(1)(B) of Section 11-1.20 or paragraph (3) of 13    subsection (b) of Section 12-13, subdivision (d)(2) of 14    Section 11-1.30 or paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 15    Section 12-14, subdivision (b)(1.2) of Section 11-1.40 or 16    paragraph (1.2) of subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1, 17    subdivision (b)(2) of Section 11-1.40 or paragraph (2) of 18    subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 19    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the sentence shall be a 20    term of natural life imprisonment.21    (b) (Blank).22    (c) (Blank).23    (d) Subject to earlier termination under Section 3-3-8, 24the parole or mandatory supervised release term shall be 25written as part of the sentencing order and shall be as 26follows:  HB3577- 70 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1        (1) for first degree murder or for the offenses of 2    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 3    criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual assault if 4    committed on or before December 12, 2005, 3 years;5        (1.5) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 6    subsection (d), for a Class X felony except for the 7    offenses of predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 8    aggravated criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual 9    assault if committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the 10    effective date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the 11    offense of aggravated child pornography under Section 12    11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 with sentencing under 13    subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code 14    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if committed on or 15    after January 1, 2009, and except for the offense of 16    obscene depiction of a purported child with sentencing 17    under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal 18    Code of 2012, 18 months; 19        (2) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 20    subsection (d), for a Class 1 felony or a Class 2 felony 21    except for the offense of criminal sexual assault if 22    committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the effective 23    date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the offenses of 24    manufacture and dissemination of child pornography under 25    clauses (a)(1) and (a)(2) of Section 11-20.1 of the 26    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if   HB3577- 71 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for the 2    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 3    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 4    Criminal Code of 2012, 12 months;5        (3) except as provided in paragraph (4), (6), or (7) 6    of this subsection (d), for a Class 3 felony or a Class 4 7    felony, 6 months; no later than 45 days after the onset of 8    the term of mandatory supervised release, the Prisoner 9    Review Board shall conduct a discretionary discharge 10    review pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-3-8, which 11    shall include the results of a standardized risk and needs 12    assessment tool administered by the Department of 13    Corrections; the changes to this paragraph (3) made by 14    Public Act 102-1104 this amendatory Act of the 102nd 15    General Assembly apply to all individuals released on 16    mandatory supervised release on or after December 6, 2022 17    (the effective date of Public Act 102-1104) this 18    amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, including 19    those individuals whose sentences were imposed prior to 20    December 6, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 21    102-1104) this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 22    Assembly;23        (4) for defendants who commit the offense of predatory 24    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 25    sexual assault, or criminal sexual assault, on or after 26    December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act   HB3577- 72 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    94-715), or who commit the offense of aggravated child 2    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 3    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 4    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 5    manufacture of child pornography, or dissemination of 6    child pornography after January 1, 2009, or who commit the 7    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 8    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 9    Criminal Code of 2012 or who commit the offense of obscene 10    depiction of a purported child with sentencing under 11    subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 12    2012, the term of mandatory supervised release shall range 13    from a minimum of 3 years to a maximum of the natural life 14    of the defendant;15        (5) if the victim is under 18 years of age, for a 16    second or subsequent offense of aggravated criminal sexual 17    abuse or felony criminal sexual abuse, 4 years, at least 18    the first 2 years of which the defendant shall serve in an 19    electronic monitoring or home detention program under 20    Article 8A of Chapter V of this Code;21        (6) for a felony domestic battery, aggravated domestic 22    battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, and a felony 23    violation of an order of protection, 4 years; 24        (7) for any felony described in paragraph (a)(2)(ii), 25    (a)(2)(iii), (a)(2)(iv), (a)(2)(vi), (a)(2.1), (a)(2.3), 26    (a)(2.4), (a)(2.5), or (a)(2.6) of Article 5, Section   HB3577- 73 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1    3-6-3 of the Unified Code of Corrections requiring an 2    inmate to serve a minimum of 85% of their court-imposed 3    sentence, except for the offenses of predatory criminal 4    sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 5    assault, and criminal sexual assault if committed on or 6    after December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 7    94-715) and except for the offense of aggravated child 8    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 9    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 10    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 11    if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for 12    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 13    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 14    Criminal Code of 2012, and except as provided in paragraph 15    (4) or paragraph (6) of this subsection (d), the term of 16    mandatory supervised release shall be as follows:17            (A) Class X felony, 3 years;18            (B) Class 1 or Class 2 felonies, 2 years;19            (C) Class 3 or Class 4 felonies, 1 year. 20    (e) (Blank).21    (f) (Blank).22    (g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act and 23of Public Act 101-652: (i) the provisions of paragraph (3) of 24subsection (d) are effective on July 1, 2022 and shall apply to 25all individuals convicted on or after the effective date of 26paragraph (3) of subsection (d); and (ii) the provisions of   HB3577- 74 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of subsection (d) are effective on 2July 1, 2021 and shall apply to all individuals convicted on or 3after the effective date of paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of 4subsection (d).5(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 6102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1104, eff. 12-6-22; 103-51, eff. 71-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-24-24.)  HB3577- 75 -LRB104 11037 RLC 21119 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    720 ILCS 5/24-1from Ch. 38, par. 24-14    720 ILCS 5/24-1.65    720 ILCS 5/24-26    720 ILCS 5/24-5.17    730 ILCS 5/5-5-3.28    730 ILCS 5/5-8-1from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1